Oklahoma, session 2025, SB928.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 650.12 of Title 21, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section, “county employee” means any person
employed by a county, including any duly appointed person, or an
employee of a firm contracting with a county.
B. Any person who, without justifiable or excusable cause,
commits any assault, battery, or assault and battery upon the person
of a county employee while such employee is in the performance of
his or her duties shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor
punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for a period not to
exceed one (1) year, a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars
($1,000.00), or by both such imprisonment and fine.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB928 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

C. Any person who, without justifiable or excusable cause,
commits any aggravated battery or aggravated assault and battery
upon the person of a county employee shall, upon conviction, be
guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the
Department of Corrections for a term not to exceed two (2) years, a
fine not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by both
such imprisonment and fine.
D. Every county site shall post in a prominent place a notice
having the following or similar language: “FELONY CHARGES MAY BE
FILED AGAINST ANY PERSON(S) COMMITTING AN AGGRAVATED ASSAULT OR
BATTERY UPON ANY COUNTY EMPLOYEE.”
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
February 25, 2025 - DO PASS











SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB928 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)